hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX U7 вны ланаясныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяснысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяснысӧ/G2 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяснытӧ/G2 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаяссяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясті/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаястӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланаясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланін/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладор/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладорас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладорӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладорсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладорсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладорын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінладорыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланьысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлаыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлаыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлӧнӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланіннысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінсяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінті/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінтӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъядӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъямӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъянӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяныдӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъянымӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъянысӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъяса/G1G2G3 .
SFX U7 вны ланінъясад/G1G2G3 .
