hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
снабжайтчывны/U7V5
гижыштлывны/U7V5
упорядочитавны/U7V5
тракъявны/U7V5
кильсйӧдлыштавны/U7V5
атакуйтавны/U7V5
грыма-грамакывны/U7V5
кретша-кратшакывны/U7V5
попытайтчывны/U7V5
сепысавны/U7V5
фанатавны/U7V5
вӧзчикавны/U7V5
султанавны/U7V5
трасичаавны/U7V5
сізьдывны/U7V5
вуджӧдсьывны/U7V5
пигунявны/U7V5
кольмывсьывны/U7V5
шмакавны/U7V5
зӧркӧдчывны/U7V5
вежӧдавны/U7V5
куршавны/U7V5
пӧдрадавны/U7V5
нюркӧдчывны/U7V5
важъявны/U7V5
корректоравны/U7V5
генсекретаравны/U7V5
сьӧвзявны/U7V5
сьӧктӧдсьывны/U7V5
ёртавны/U7V5
чувствуйтчывны/U7V5
встречайтчывны/U7V5
морякавны/U7V5
Савельевичавны/U7V5
урса-урсамунавны/U7V5
вирӧссявны/U7V5
курортавны/U7V5
кӧмӧдавны/U7V5
рубечсявны/U7V5
ниркнитавны/U7V5
брынакывны/U7V5
пансявны/U7V5
помасявны/U7V5
конфискуйтавны/U7V5
ичӧтавны/U7V5
крукыльтавны/U7V5
лэчтанавны/U7V5
дзиньявны/U7V5
ликмӧдчавны/U7V5
каръявны/U7V5
сартассявны/U7V5
клеснитчывны/U7V5
крановщикавны/U7V5
гыжмавны/U7V5
аддзывлывны/U7V5
шунавны/U7V5
гуркъявны/U7V5
шеныштчавны/U7V5
дзурсъявны/U7V5
шуксывны/U7V5
чургӧдчавны/U7V5
ыштавны/U7V5
роксявны/U7V5
тшыгӧмавны/U7V5
путкыльтавны/U7V5
гамавны/U7V5
троньявны/U7V5
шемӧстчывны/U7V5
тутӧставны/U7V5
меститчавны/U7V5
этшавны/U7V5
пузьӧдавны/U7V5
асылавны/U7V5
кӧзяйкаавны/U7V5
ёмаавны/U7V5
лыаавны/U7V5
торпыригавны/U7V5
гугавны/U7V5
семдавны/U7V5
тыдӧдавны/U7V5
пыкӧдавны/U7V5
тшупӧдавны/U7V5
вӧччӧдавны/U7V5
небыдавны/U7V5
кежавны/U7V5
вежавидзавны/U7V5
ырзавны/U7V5
алыкавны/U7V5
зӧркавны/U7V5
лёкавны/U7V5
отпускавны/U7V5
сӧнікавны/U7V5
чашкавны/U7V5
дзеблавны/U7V5
гумлавны/U7V5
йӧрлавны/U7V5
гылавны/U7V5
пӧимавны/U7V5
синтӧмавны/U7V5
пӧрысьмавны/U7V5
шпионавны/U7V5
эшкынавны/U7V5
тшепавны/U7V5
пӧнӧмаравны/U7V5
фермеравны/U7V5
виравны/U7V5
хлоравны/U7V5
тӧравны/U7V5
вугыравны/U7V5
дӧмасавны/U7V5
госавны/U7V5
мыльӧсавны/U7V5
ульсавны/U7V5
петавны/U7V5
сёрнитавны/U7V5
снимайтавны/U7V5
юктавны/U7V5
чептавны/U7V5
кыкпӧвставны/U7V5
дорӧставны/U7V5
няргыштавны/U7V5
кесйӧдыштавны/U7V5
горӧдыштавны/U7V5
тыдыштавны/U7V5
сёйыштавны/U7V5
тупкыштавны/U7V5
мыськыштавны/U7V5
варовмыштавны/U7V5
гӧгӧрвоыштавны/U7V5
весыштавны/U7V5
видзтыштавны/U7V5
ырснитыштавны/U7V5
ёнтыштавны/U7V5
лӧстыштавны/U7V5
веськӧдчыштавны/U7V5
матыстчыштавны/U7V5
чуньыштавны/U7V5
кодйысьыштавны/U7V5
буавны/U7V5
сайӧдчавны/U7V5
вичавны/U7V5
быгыльтчавны/U7V5
нитшавны/U7V5
люавны/U7V5
бузгывны/U7V5
няргывны/U7V5
юждывны/U7V5
кельдывны/U7V5
гудйывны/U7V5
пасйывны/U7V5
чива-лювакывны/U7V5
тяпкакывны/U7V5
шпоткакывны/U7V5
рутшкакывны/U7V5
клюпакывны/U7V5
тувкывны/U7V5
парскывны/U7V5
личкывны/U7V5
ытшкывны/U7V5
доякывны/U7V5
серавлывны/U7V5
дзуглывны/U7V5
торйӧдлывны/U7V5
пӧрӧдлывны/U7V5
пуксьӧдлывны/U7V5
сюйлывны/U7V5
тырлывны/U7V5
ӧткажитлывны/U7V5
тӧчитлывны/U7V5
ӧтдортлывны/U7V5
шулывны/U7V5
воласьлывны/U7V5
усьлывны/U7V5
оръясьлывны/U7V5
чусыдмывны/U7V5
ӧкмывны/U7V5
сӧстӧммывны/U7V5
изӧрмывны/U7V5
шочмывны/U7V5
пӧрысьмывны/U7V5
шкорӧбтывны/U7V5
таджиктывны/U7V5
чуктывны/U7V5
куштывны/U7V5
дзигӧдчывны/U7V5
назӧдчывны/U7V5
йиркӧдчывны/U7V5
падмӧдчывны/U7V5
прӧстмӧдчывны/U7V5
матӧдчывны/U7V5
пузьӧдчывны/U7V5
гумовтчывны/U7V5
правитчывны/U7V5
кажитчывны/U7V5
шванитчывны/U7V5
рӧзьнитчывны/U7V5
краситчывны/U7V5
сомневайтчывны/U7V5
печатайтчывны/U7V5
соревнуйтчывны/U7V5
вотчывны/U7V5
зыртчывны/U7V5
кутчывны/U7V5
ырыштчывны/U7V5
пешкыльтчывны/U7V5
мыччывны/U7V5
вӧрзьывны/U7V5
лолавсьывны/U7V5
мойдсьывны/U7V5
лыйсьывны/U7V5
дорсьывны/U7V5
кодзулӧссьывны/U7V5
лэптыссьывны/U7V5
мӧвпыштсьывны/U7V5
саявны/U7V5
ломзявны/U7V5
заседателявны/U7V5
нямлявны/U7V5
читкылявны/U7V5
шыннявны/U7V5
немӧявны/U7V5
гагсявны/U7V5
йӧнсявны/U7V5
воссявны/U7V5
кепысявны/U7V5
пиньтуявны/U7V5
дувъявны/U7V5
тшыгъявны/U7V5
эджъявны/U7V5
лызъявны/U7V5
лайкъявны/U7V5
пыркъявны/U7V5
мӧмъявны/U7V5
шӧпъявны/U7V5
шпоръявны/U7V5
корсъявны/U7V5
шешъявны/U7V5
пасьявны/U7V5
инженеравны/U7V5
сӧвтчавны/U7V5
гӧрддзыштчывны/U7V5
объясняйтчывны/U7V5
кыртӧдавны/U7V5
выныштчавны/U7V5
пытайтчывны/U7V5
гумовтавны/U7V5
верӧспуавны/U7V5
йӧрыштчывны/U7V5
ӧгӧдавны/U7V5
строфаавны/U7V5
тракйӧдлыштавны/U7V5
